Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-11] Subsequent litigation; excluded
evidence. The claimant may institute litigation based upon the claim in an
appropriate court only after a party to a design claim conciliation panel
hearing rejects the decision of the panel, or after the twelve-month period
under section 672B‑15 has expired.

No statement made in the course of the hearing
of the design claim conciliation panel shall be admissible in evidence either
as an admission, to impeach the credibility of a witness, or for any other
purpose in any trial of the action; provided that the statements may be
admissible for the purpose of section 672B-16. No decision, conclusion,
finding, or recommendation of the design claim conciliation panel on the issue
of liability or on the issue of damages shall be admitted into evidence in any
subsequent trial, nor shall any party to the design claim conciliation panel
hearing, or the counsel or other representative of the party, refer or comment
thereon in an opening statement, an argument, or at any other time, to the
court or jury; provided that the decision, conclusion, finding, or
recommendation may be admissible for the purpose of section 672B-16. [L 2007, c
207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next